District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0474.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Pathways to Prosperity for Young Parents Pilot Amendment Act of
2025”.
Sec. 2. The Youth Employment Act of 1979, effective January 5, 1980 (D.C. Law 3-46;
D.C. Code § 32-241 et al) is amended as follows:
(a) Section 2 is amended by adding a new paragraph (9) to read as follows:
“(9) “Young Adult Parent” means an individual aged 16 through 24 who is the
custodial or non-custodial parent of a child under 18 years of age.”.
(b) Section 2a(a) is amended by adding a new paragraph (8) to read as follows:
“(8) Young Adult Parents Employment Voucher Pilot Program. —


“(A) The Mayor, through the Department of Employment Services
(“DOES”), shall establish a one-year pilot program providing up to 100 employment vouchers to
subsidize wages for young adult parents who are domiciliaries of the District of Columbia.
“(B) Each voucher shall provide a subsidy of not more than 50
percent of the prevailing hourly wage for the position filled for up to 40 hours per week for no
longer than 12 months, provided that:
“(i) The employer pays the remaining wage share and
provides all standard employee fringe benefits offered to other employees in comparable
positions; and
“(ii) The position provides a work experience reasonably
calculated to result in the transition to unsubsidized employment.
“(C) Eligible employers shall include public agencies, nonprofit
organizations, and private-sector businesses with a physical location in the District that are in
good standing with the Department of Licensing and Consumer Protection.
“(D) An employer participating in the program shall enter into a
memorandum of understanding with DOES affirming a commitment to consider the voucher
employee for permanent employment at the conclusion of the subsidy period.
“(E) DOES, in coordination with the Office of the Deputy Mayor
for Planning and Economic Development and the Department of Human Services (“DHS”), shall
engage employers in the private sector, with an emphasis on businesses that are eligible as local
business enterprises, small business enterprises, or disadvantaged business enterprises, as such
terms are defined in § 2-218.02,
“(F) DOES shall partner with DHS, the Office of the State


Superintendent of Education, and other relevant agencies to identify and refer eligible young
adult parents for participation.
“(G) DOES may provide additional supportive services to
participants, including transportation assistance, workforce counseling, job readiness training,
and access to childcare resources, as necessary to support successful completion of the program.
“(H) By December 1, 2027, DOES shall submit to the Council a
report evaluating the effectiveness of the pilot program, including the number of participants,
completion and attrition rates, placement outcomes, and recommendations on whether to make
the program permanent.”.
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.